Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB150.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9777 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is repealed:[§ 9777. Transfer of inmates in need of medical treatment.(a) Inmates committed to custody of department.--If an inmate is committed to the custody of the department, the department, the inmate or a person to whom the court grants standing to act on behalf of the inmate may petition the sentencing court to temporarily defer service of the sentence of confinement and temporarily remove the inmate committed to the 12345678910111213141516 custody of the department, or other facility, for placement in a hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location. The following shall apply:(1) The sentencing court may approve the petitioner's request to temporarily defer service of the sentence of confinement and place the inmate in a hospital or long-term care nursing facility under electronic monitoring by the department upon clear and convincing proof that all of the following apply:(i) The medical needs of the inmate can be more appropriately addressed in the hospital or long-term care nursing facility.(ii) The hospital or long-term care nursing facility requested by the petitioner has agreed to accept the placement of the inmate and to provide necessary medical care.(iii) The inmate is seriously ill and is expected by a treating physician to not live for more than one year.(iv) There are no writs filed or detainers lodged against the inmate and the inmate is not subject to any court order requiring the inmate's presence.(v) The placement in the hospital or long-term care nursing facility does not pose an undue risk of escape or danger to the community. In making this determination, the sentencing court shall consider the inmate's institutional conduct record, whether the inmate was ever convicted of a crime of violence, the length of time that the inmate has been imprisoned and any other factors the sentencing court deems relevant.(vi) The hospital or long-term care nursing facility 20250HB0150PN2066 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 has agreed to notify the department and the court of any material changes in the health status of the inmate, the nature of the care provided or other information required by the department.(vii) Each agency representing the Commonwealth at a proceeding which resulted in an order committing or detaining the inmate, the State or local correctional facility housing the inmate and any registered crime victim have been given notice and an opportunity to be heard on the petition.(2) The sentencing court may approve the petitioner's request to temporarily defer service of the sentence of confinement in order for the inmate to receive care from a licensed hospice care provider, proposed by the petitioner and subject to electronic monitoring by the department, if all of the following are established by clear and convincing proof:(i) The inmate is terminally ill, not ambulatory and likely to die in the near future.(ii) The licensed hospice care provider can provide the inmate with more appropriate care.(iii) Appropriate medical care and palliative and supportive services will be provided by the licensed hospice care provider at the proposed hospice care location.(iv) The placement of the inmate in the proposed, licensed hospice care location does not pose an undue risk of escape or danger to the community. In making this determination, the sentencing court shall consider the inmate's institutional conduct record, whether the inmate 20250HB0150PN2066 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 was ever convicted of a crime of violence, the length of time that the inmate has been imprisoned and any other factors the sentencing court deems relevant.(v) The licensed hospice care provider has agreed to notify the department and the sentencing court of any material changes in the health status of the inmate, the nature of the hospice care provided or other information required by the department or the sentencing court.(vi) Each agency representing the Commonwealth at a proceeding which resulted in an order committing or detaining the inmate, the State or local correctional facility housing the inmate and any registered crime victim have been given notice and an opportunity to be heard on the petition.(3) Any order entered pursuant to this subsection temporarily deferring service of an inmate's sentence of confinement shall include a provision that the department or prosecuting attorney may at any time petition the sentencing court for an order directing that the inmate be recommitted to the custody of the department if the circumstances under which the inmate was released change or for any previously unknown circumstances, including a change in the inmate's medical status, the inmate's risk of escape, the inmate's danger to the community or the nature of the medical or other care provided by the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care provider.(4) The sentencing court may terminate at any time its order authorizing the temporary deferral of the service of an inmate's sentence of confinement entered pursuant to this subsection. An inmate taken into custody pursuant to an order 20250HB0150PN2066 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 directing the inmate's detention or recommitment under this subsection shall be delivered to the nearest State correctional institution pending a hearing on the matter.(b) Inmates committed to custody of other facilities.--An inmate not committed to the custody of the department but confined in an institution authorized to incarcerate or detain persons for criminal sentences, violations of criminal law or orders of parole, probation, bail or other order related to a civil or criminal matter may have service of the sentence of confinement deferred and may be placed in a hospital, long-term care nursing facility or licensed hospice care location, subject to electronic monitoring, by order of the judge that committed the inmate to the facility or institution or by another available judge designated to preside if all of the following are established by clear and convincing proof:(1) The chief administrator, the chief administrator's designee, the inmate or a person to whom the court grants standing to act on behalf of the inmate petitions the court or has given written consent to the grant of a petition under this section filed on behalf of the inmate.(2) There is sufficient proof to establish the requirements for a placement to a hospital or long-term care nursing facility under subsection (a)(1) or a placement to a hospice care location under subsection (a)(2).(3) An entry of an order pursuant to this subsection temporarily deferring service of an inmate's sentence of confinement shall include a provision that the chief administrator or the prosecuting attorney may at any time petition the sentencing court seeking the issuance of a bench warrant directing that the inmate be recommitted to the 20250HB0150PN2066 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 custody of the appropriate correctional institution if the circumstances under which the inmate was released change or for previously unknown circumstances, including a change in the inmate's medical status, the inmate's risk of escape, the inmate's danger to the community or the nature of the medical or other care provided by the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care provider.(4) The sentencing court may terminate at any time its order authorizing the temporary deferral of the service of an inmate's sentence of confinement entered pursuant to this subsection. An inmate taken into custody pursuant to an order directing detention or recommitment under this subsection shall be delivered to the county correctional institution or other institution at which the inmate was confined prior to the entry of the order deferring the service of the sentence of confinement pending a hearing on the matter.(c) Service.--Any petition filed under this section shall be served on each agency representing the Commonwealth at each proceeding which resulted in an order by which the inmate is committed or detained and to the correctional institution or institution responsible for housing the inmate. Each party shall have an opportunity to object and be heard as to the petition for alternative placement, the circumstances of placement, the conditions of return or any other relevant issue. The court shall ensure that any crime victim entitled to notification under section 201(7) or (8) of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act, has been given notice and the opportunity to be heard on the petition. All parties served or notified under this subsection shall receive a copy of the final order adjudicating the petition.20250HB0150PN2066 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Notice.--(1) Any order entered under this section placing an inmate in a hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location which provides care to persons who were not placed therein pursuant to an order entered under this section shall direct the individual in charge of the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location to ensure that each person receiving care at, and each employee or contractor working in, the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location is notified that the placement was ordered if it is foreseeable that the person, employee or contractor will come into contact with the inmate during the placement.(2) The sentencing court shall forward notice of any order entered under this section placing an inmate in a hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location to the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location and to the Department of Human Services.(e) Petition requirements.--Any petition filed pursuant to this section must aver:(1) The name of the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location proposed for placement.(2) That the petitioner reasonably believes the named hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location has agreed to accept the placement of the inmate and the facts upon which that belief is based.(f) Removal from placement.--If an inmate placed in a hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location pursuant to this chapter removes himself from the 20250HB0150PN2066 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location, the inmate shall be subject to arrest upon probable cause and shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of criminal contempt.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chief administrator." As defined under 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Department." The Department of Corrections of the Commonwealth."Hospice care location." A home, independent living environment or inpatient setting that provides a coordinated program of palliative and supportive services through a licensed hospice care provider."Hospital." An entity licensed as an acute-care general hospital, a specialty hospital or a rehabilitation hospital under the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Licensed hospice care provider." A hospice as defined under section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Long-term care nursing facility." A long-term care nursing facility as defined under section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Prosecuting attorney." The Office of Attorney General of the Commonwealth or the office of a district attorney of a county who represented the Commonwealth at the most recent sentencing of an inmate."Sentencing court." The trial judge who most recently 20250HB0150PN2066 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sentenced an inmate or, if the trial judge is no longer serving as a judge of that court, the president judge of the county court of common pleas.]Section 2. Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9778. Modification of an imposed term of imprisonment for reasons of illness.(a) Authority of court.--The court that imposed a sentence on a defendant or inmate may modify a term of imprisonment upon petition by the secretary, chief administrator of any other institution, the prosecuting attorney, the inmate or the court if either of the following conditions is satisfied:(1) Extraordinary and compelling family hardship warrants the modification. A hardship may include the following:(i) the death or physical or mental incapacitation of the caregiver for the inmate's minor child or children; or(ii) the physical or mental incapacitation of the inmate's spouse or partner if the inmate would be the only available caregiver for the spouse or partner.(2) The inmate has a substantially diminished ability to function in a correctional facility due to:(i) a terminal illness;(ii) a chronic and debilitating physical or medical condition or disease;(iii) a serious functional or cognitive impairment; or(iv) deteriorating physical or mental health due to the aging process.(A) AUTHORITY OF COURT.--THE COURT THAT IMPOSED A SENTENCE 20250HB0150PN2066 - 9 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ON A DEFENDANT OR INMATE MAY MODIFY A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT UPON PETITION BY THE SECRETARY, THE CHIEF ADMINISTRATOR OF ANY OTHER INSTITUTION, THE PROSECUTING ATTORNEY, THE INMATE OR THE COURT, WHICH ESTABLISHES CLEAR AND CONVINCING PROOF THAT ANY OF THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS ARE SATISFIED:(1) THE DEFENDANT OR INMATE HAS BEEN DIAGNOSED BY A TREATING PROVIDER OR PHYSICIAN WITH A TERMINAL ILLNESS THAT WILL REDUCE THE INDIVIDUAL'S LIFE EXPECTANCY.(2) THE DEFENDANT OR INMATE HAS BEEN DIAGNOSED BY A TREATING PROVIDER OR PHYSICIAN WITH A SERIOUS ILLNESS THAT RESULTS IN THE INABILITY TO INDEPENDENTLY PERFORM ONE OR MORE ACTIVITIES OF DAILY LIVING.(3) THE DEFENDANT OR INMATE HAS BEEN DIAGNOSED BY A TREATING PROVIDER OR PHYSICIAN WITH A LIFE-THREATENING ILLNESS THAT CAN BE MORE APPROPRIATELY TREATED OUTSIDE THE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY AND FOR WHICH THE MORE APPROPRIATE TREATMENT MAY PREVENT PREMATURE DEATH.(4) THE DEFENDANT OR INMATE HAS BEEN DIAGNOSED BY A TREATING PROVIDER OR PHYSICIAN WITH A SERIOUS FUNCTIONAL OR COGNITIVE IMPAIRMENT, OR WITH DETERIORATING PHYSICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH DUE TO THE AGING PROCESS, THAT RESULTS IN THE INABILITY TO INDEPENDENTLY PERFORM ONE OR MORE ACTIVITIES OF DAILY LIVING.(b) Notification and decision requirements.--(1) If a petition for sentence modification is filed by an inmate under subsection (a), the inmate shall provide a copy of the petition to the department or other institution within seven business days of filing the petition.(2) Within three business days of receiving the inmate's petition for modification under paragraph (1), or within 20250HB0150PN2066 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 three business days of the department or other institution filing a petition on behalf of an inmate under subsection (a), the department, other institution or the district attorney for the county where the conviction occurred shall, subject to any applicable confidentiality requirements, notify the Office of the Victim Advocate and any registered victim of the inmate's offense of the petition and the general reasons for the petition and provide an opportunity to respond to the court in writing within seven days.(3) The department or other institution shall, subject to any applicable confidentiality requirements:(i) In the case of an inmate diagnosed with a terminal illness:(A) No later than 72 hours after the diagnosis by a medical professional employed or contracted by the department or other institution:(I) Notify the inmate's last attorney of record, spouse or partner and immediate family members of the inmate's condition.(II) Inform the inmate's attorney, spouse or partner and family members that they may prepare and submit on the inmate's behalf a petition for sentence modification under subsection (a)(2) (A) . (III) Provide the inmate's medical records to the inmate and the inmate's attorney, spouse or partner or family member.(B) No later than seven days after the date of the diagnosis, provide the inmate's spouse or partner and immediate or extended family members with an 20250HB0150PN2066 - 11 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 opportunity to visit the inmate in person unless compelling reasons exist for denying the visit and the reasons are provided in writing.(C) Upon request from the inmate or the inmate's attorney, spouse or partner or family members, ensure that the department or other institution employees assist the inmate in the preparation, drafting or submission of a petition for sentence modification under subsection (a)(2) (A) . (ii) In the case of an inmate who is physically or mentally unable to prepare or file a petition for sentencing modification under subsection (a)(2) (A) : (A) Inform the inmate's attorney, spouse or partner and family members that they may prepare and submit a petition for sentencing modification under subsection (a)(2) (A) . (B) Upon request from the inmate, the inmate's attorney, spouse or partner or family members:(I) Ensure that the department or other institution employee staff assist the inmate in the preparation, drafting and submission of a petition for sentence modification under subsection (a)(2) (A) . (II) Within three days of the request, provide the inmate's medical records to the inmate, the inmate's attorney, spouse or partner or family members.(iii) Ensure that all department or other institutional facilities regularly and visibly post, including in inmate handbooks, staff training materials 20250HB0150PN2066 - 12 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and facility law libraries and medical and hospice facilities, and make available to inmates upon demand, notice of:(A) An inmate's right to petition for a sentence modification under subsection (a).(B) The procedures and timelines for initiating and resolving petitions described in subsections (c)(2) and (d).(c) Judicial procedure.--(1) Upon receipt of a petition for a sentence modification under subsection (a), the court:(i) Shall give the Commonwealth an opportunity to respond to the petition in writing within 10 days or a shorter time as set by the court.(ii) May order a hearing on the petition without requiring the inmate to attend in person.(iii) Shall request, from the department or other institution, the petitioner's disciplinary record. The record shall be provided to the court within 10 days or a shorter time as set by the court.(2) The court shall:(i) Issue a decision on the petition, stating the reasons for the decision and the decision shall be made : (A) Within 60 days of a petition made under subsection (a)(1).(B) Within WITHIN 30 days of a petition made under subsection (a)(2) (A) . (ii) Immediately provide a copy of the decision to the inmate, the inmates' attorney, the Office of Victim Advocate, the secretary, the chief administrator of any 20250HB0150PN2066 - 13 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other facility and any registered victim of the inmate's offense.(3) The court shall, when issuing a decision on the petition, consider the following:(i) Any response to the petition for sentence modification by the Office of Victim Advocate and any registered victim of the inmate's offense.(ii) Any recommendation of the secretary or chief administrator of any other institution.(iii) The inmate's instant offense or offenses of conviction.(iv) The inmate's sentence and time served on the instant offense or offenses of conviction.(v) The inmate's current age, physical and mental condition and ability to function within a correctional environment.(vi) The inmate's postrelease care plan, if any.(vii) The inmate's disciplinary record while incarcerated as well as any history of accomplishments, programing attended or other records demonstrating rehabilitation.(viii) The likelihood that the inmate would pose an unreasonable risk of danger to others or the community if released.(4) In granting a petition under subsection (a), the court may impose any reasonable condition of release that might be imposed under a sentence of probation under section 9754 (relating to order of probation) and any other condition specifically tailored to the circumstances giving rise to the order that is least restrictive of an inmate's liberty.20250HB0150PN2066 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) An order granting or denying a petition under this section shall be a final order for the purposes of Pa.R.A.P. No. 341 (relating to final orders; generally).(d) Annual report.--No later than one year after September 1, 2026, and once every year thereafter, the secretary shall submit to the Judiciary Committee of the Senate and the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives a report on petitions for sentence modifications under subsection (a), which shall include descriptions of the following:(1) The number of inmates granted and denied sentence modifications, categorized by the criteria relied on for the grounds for a modification in sentence.(2) The number of petitions initiated by or on behalf of inmates, categorized by the criteria relied on as the grounds for a modification in sentence.(3) The number of petitions that the department employees assisted inmates in drafting, preparing or filing, categorized by the criteria relied on as the grounds for a modification in sentence and the final decision made in each petition.(4) The number of petitions that the attorneys, spouses or partners or family members submitted on an inmate's behalf, categorized by the criteria relied on as the grounds for a modification in sentence and the final decision made in each petition.(5) The number of petitions filed in court by the secretary, categorized by the criteria relied on as the grounds for a modification in sentence and the final decision made in each petition.(6) For each petition filed in court by the secretary 20250HB0150PN2066 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under subsection (a)(2) (A) BASED ON A DIAGNOSIS OF TERMINAL ILLNESS , the time elapsed between the date the inmate was diagnosed with a terminal illness and the date the secretary filed the petition in court, categorized by the criteria relied on as the grounds for a modification in sentence and the final decision made in each petition.(7) For each criteria listed in subsection (a), the number of inmates who died while a petition for sentence modification was pending.(8) The number of department notifications to attorneys, spouses or partners and family members of their right to visit a terminally ill inmate as required under subsection (b)(3)(i) and, for each notification, whether the visit occurred and how much time elapsed between the notification and the visit.(9) The number of visits to each terminally ill inmates that were denied by the department due to security or other concerns and the reason given for each denial.(e) Regulations.--The department and the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall promulgate rules and regulations to comply with the requirements of this section within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chronic and debilitating physical or medical condition or disease." The term includes a medical condition that is persistent or permanent, requires medication or ongoing care from a physician or impairs a person's ability to perform routine daily tasks or self care.20250HB0150PN2066 - 16 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "ACTIVITIES OF DAILY LIVING." FUNDAMENTAL SELF-CARE TASKS ESSENTIAL FOR INDEPENDENT LIVING, INCLUDING BATHING, DRESSING, EATING, TRANSFERRING SUCH AS MOVING BETWEEN A BED AND A CHAIR, TOILETING AND PERSONAL HYGIENE."Department." The Department of Corrections of the Commonwealth."Deteriorating physical or mental health." The term includes a loss of mobility in the limbs or body, inability to walk without assistance, incontinence, forgetfulness, disorientation or inability to perform routine daily tasks or self care without assistance or supervision."LIFE-LIMITING ILLNESS." A MEDICAL CONDITION THAT IS INCURABLE AND PROGRESSIVE AND THAT WILL SHORTEN THE INDIVIDUAL'S LIFE."Other institution." An institution other than the department that is authorized to incarcerate or detain individuals for criminal sentences, violations of criminal law or orders of parole, probation, bail or other order related to a civil or criminal matter."Secretary." The Secretary of Corrections of the Commonwealth."Serious functional or cognitive impairment." A condition that is persistent or permanent and limits the inmate's ability to reason, perceive, comprehend or communicate. The term includes intellectual disabilities, mental illness, dementia and brain damage from injury or stroke."Substantially diminished." The inmate is unable or only partially able to perform one or more essential daily tasks or self care without partial or total assistance or supervision."Terminal illness." A disease or condition with an end-of-20250HB0150PN2066 - 17 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 life trajectory, with or without a specific prognosis of life expectancy. The term includes metastatic solid tumor cancer, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, end-stage organ disease and advanced dementia."TERMINAL ILLNESS." AN INCURABLE DISEASE OR CONDITION THAT IS LIFE-LIMITING AND HAS AN END-OF-LIFE TRAJECTORY, WITH OR WITHOUT A SPECIFIC PROGNOSIS OF LIFE EXPECTANCY. THE TERM INCLUDES METASTATIC SOLID TUMOR CANCER, AMYOTROPHIC LATERAL SCLEROSIS, END-STAGE ORGAN DISEASE AND ADVANCED DEMENTIA.Section 3. Any regulations or parts of regulations are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the repeal or addition of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 9777 and 9778.Section 4. This act shall apply to an individual sentenced on, before or after the effective date of this section.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0150PN2066 - 18 - <--123456789101112131415